California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 general partner or upon the dissolution of the partnership. The disassociating partner or the remaining partner or partners shall notify the registrar in writing within 90 days of the disassociation of a general partner or dissolution of the partnership. Failure to notify the registrar of the disassociation or dissolution within 90 days shall cause the license to be canceled effective the date the written notification is received at the board’s headquarters office. Failure to notify the registrar within 90 days of the disassociation or dissolution is grounds for disciplinary action. The remaining general partner or partners may request a continuance of the license to complete projects contracted for or in progress prior to the date of disassociation or dissolution for a reasonable length of time to be determined by rules of the board. The request for a continuance must be made in writing and received at the board’s headquarters office within 90 days after the disassociation or dissolution. The remaining
 general partner or partners must apply for and obtain a new license to undertake new work and to continue contracting after the continuance expires.

(d) The general partner or partners shall notify the registrar in writing within 90 days of the death of a limited partner. Failure to notify the registrar within 90 days of the death is grounds for disciplinary action.

The death of a limited partner will not affect the partnership license unless the partnership license has only one limited partner. In this case, the license will be canceled upon the death of the limited partner unless a new limited partner is added to the license within 90 days of the death.

If the license is canceled, the remaining general partner or partners may request a continuance of the license to complete projects in progress and to undertake new work for a reasonable amount of time to be
 determined by rules of the board. The request for a continuance must be made in writing and received at the board’s headquarters office within 90 days after the death. The remaining general partner or partners must apply for and obtain a new license to continue contracting after the continuance expires.

(e) The general partner or partners shall notify the registrar in writing within 90 days of the disassociation of a limited partner. Failure to notify the registrar of the disassociation, within 90 days, shall cause the disassociation to be effective the date the written notification is received at the board’s headquarters office. Failure to notify the registrar within 90 days of the disassociation is grounds for disciplinary action.

The disassociation of a limited partner will not affect the partnership license unless the partnership license has only one limited partner. In this case, the license will
 be canceled upon the disassociation of the limited partner unless a new limited partner is added to the license within 90 days of the disassociation. If the license is canceled, the remaining general partner or partners may request a continuance of the license to complete projects contracted for or in progress prior to the date of disassociation for a reasonable amount of time to be determined by rules of the board. The request for a continuance must be made in writing and received at the board’s headquarters office within 90 days after the disassociation. The remaining general partner or partners must apply for and obtain a new license to undertake new work and to continue contracting after the continuance expires.

(f) A joint venture license shall be canceled upon the cancellation, revocation, or disassociation of any of its entity licenses or upon the dissolution of the joint venture. The registrar shall be notified in writing within 90 days
 of the disassociation of a joint venture entity or dissolution of the joint venture. Failure to notify the registrar of the disassociation or dissolution within 90 days shall cause the license to be canceled effective the date the written notification is received at the board’s headquarters office. Failure to notify the registrar within 90 days of the disassociation or dissolution is grounds for disciplinary action.

Any remaining entity or entities may request a continuance of the license to complete projects contracted for or in progress prior to the date of disassociation or dissolution for a reasonable amount of time to be determined by rules of the board. The request for a continuance must be made in writing and received at the board’s headquarters office within 90 days of the disassociation or dissolution. The remaining entity or entities must apply for and obtain a new license to undertake new work and to continue contracting after the continuance expires.

(g) Any individual, partnership, or joint venture license continued in accordance with this section is subject to all other provisions of this chapter.

(h) A corporation license shall be canceled upon the corporation’s dissolution, merger, or surrender of its right to do business in this state. The corporation or participating tribe shall notify the registrar in writing within 90 days of the dissolution, merger, or surrender. Failure to notify the registrar of the dissolution, merger, or surrender within 90 days shall cause the license to be canceled effective the date written notification is received at the board’s headquarters office. If the corporation or participating tribe fails to notify the board of the dissolution, merger, or surrender, the corporation license shall be canceled 60 days after the board’s discovery when researching the relevant corporate records. Failure to
 notify the registrar within 90 days of the dissolution, merger, or surrender is grounds for disciplinary action.

(i) A limited liability company license shall be canceled upon the company’s dissolution, merger, or surrender of its right to do business in this state. The limited liability company shall notify the registrar in writing within 90 days of the dissolution, merger, or surrender. Failure to notify the registrar of the dissolution, merger, or surrender within 90 days shall cause the license to be canceled effective the date written notification is received at the board’s headquarters office. If the limited liability company fails to notify the board of the dissolution, merger, or surrender, the limited liability company license shall be canceled 60 days after the board’s discovery when researching the records of the Secretary of State. Failure to notify the registrar within 90 days of the dissolution, merger, or surrender is grounds for
 disciplinary action.

(j) The registrar shall review and accept the petition of a licensee who disputes the date of cancellation upon a showing of good cause. This petition shall be received within 90 days of the board’s official notice of cancellation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 10.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7076.1.

Upon the voluntary surrender of a license by a licensee, the registrar shall order the license canceled. Cancellation will be effected upon receipt of the request by the registrar. No refund will be made of any fee which a licensee may have paid prior to the surrender of the license.

To reinstate a canceled license the licensee must pay all of the fees and meet all of the qualifications and requirements set forth in this chapter for obtaining an original license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 329.)
-------------------------------------------

7076.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the failure of a contractor licensed to do business as a corporation or limited liability company in this state to be registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State after notice from the registrar shall result in the automatic suspension of the license by operation of law. The registrar shall notify the licensee in writing of its failure to be registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State and that the licensee shall be suspended 30 days from the date of the notice if the licensee does not provide proof satisfactory to the registrar that it is properly registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State. Reinstatement may be made at any time following the suspension by providing proof satisfactory to the registrar that the license is properly
 registered and in good standing.

(b) Where the license of a limited liability company is suspended pursuant to subdivision (a), each person within the company identified in Section 7028.5 shall be personally liable up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) each for damages resulting to third parties in connection with the company’s performance, during the period of suspension, of any act or contract where a license is required by this chapter. This personal liability shall not apply where there has been substantial compliance with the licensure requirements, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 7031.

(c) This section shall not apply to a federally recognized tribe or a participating tribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 11.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7076.5.

(a) A contractor may inactivate their license by submitting a form prescribed by the registrar accompanied by the current active license certificate. When the current license certificate has been lost, the licensee shall pay the fee prescribed by law to replace the license certificate. Upon receipt of an acceptable application to inactivate, the registrar shall issue an inactive license certificate to the contractor. The holder of an inactive license shall not be entitled to practice as a contractor until
 their license is reactivated.

(b) Any licensed contractor who is not engaged in work or activities which require a contractor’s license may apply for an inactive license.

(c) Inactive licenses shall be valid for a period of four years from their due date.

(d) During the period that an existing license is inactive, no bonding requirement pursuant to Section 7071.6, 7071.8, or 7071.9, qualifier requirement pursuant to Section 7068, or workers’ compensation requirements pursuant to Section 7125 shall apply. An applicant for licensure having met the qualifications for issuance may request that the license be issued inactive unless the applicant is subject to the provisions of Section 7071.8.

(e) The board shall not refund any of the renewal fee which a licensee may have paid prior to the inactivation of their license.

(f) An inactive license shall be renewed on each established renewal date by submitting the renewal application and paying the inactive renewal fee.

(g) An inactive license may be reactivated by submitting an application acceptable to the registrar, by paying the full renewal fee for an active license and by fulfilling all other requirements of this chapter. No examination shall be required to reactivate an inactive license.

(h) The inactive status of a license shall not bar any disciplinary action by the board against a licensee for any of
 the causes stated in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 18.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7077.

Every original license, except an additional classification issued pursuant to Section 7059, shall be a probationary license until such time as the license is renewed. If information is brought to the attention of the registrar, during such probationary period, regarding any act or omission of the licensee constituting grounds for denial, revocation, or suspension of an application or license, such that, in the registrar’s discretion, it would be proper to revoke the probationary license, the registrar shall forthwith notify the applicant to show cause within not more than 30 days, why the probationary license should not be revoked. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the registrar shall have all the powers granted therein. A probationary license shall not be renewed during the pendency of any proceedings brought pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Records [7080.5. - 7084.]

7080.5.

When an application has been accepted by the registrar, the name and address of the applicant, every classification for which the applicant has applied, and the names and titles of all personnel who have signed the application shall be publicly posted by the registrar, on the day following acceptance, in the office of the Contractors State License Board in Sacramento.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 59.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7081.

Whenever funds are available for the purpose, the registrar shall publish a list of the names and addresses of contractors, registered under this chapter and of the licenses issued, suspended or revoked, and such further information with respect to this chapter and its administration as he deems proper.

He may furnish the lists to such public works and building departments, public officials or public bodies, and other persons interested in or allied with the building and construction industry in this or any other State as he deems advisable and, at such intervals as he deems necessary whenever funds are available. 

Copies of the lists may also be furnished by the registrar upon request to any firm or individual upon payment of a reasonable fee fixed by the registrar.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7082.

Whenever funds are available for the purpose, the registrar may publish and disseminate to licentiates of the board, and public officials or other persons interested in or allied with the building and construction industry, such information with relation to the administration and enforcement of this chapter as he deems necessary to carry out its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7083.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, licensees shall notify the registrar, on a form prescribed by the registrar, in writing within 90 days of any change to information recorded under this chapter. This notification requirement shall include, but not be limited to, changes in business address, personnel, business name, qualifying individual bond exemption pursuant to Section 7071.9, or exemption to qualify multiple licenses pursuant to Section 7068.1.

(b) Failure of the licensee to notify the registrar of any change to information within 90 days shall cause the change to be effective the date the written notification is received at the board’s headquarters office.

(c) Failure to notify the registrar of the changes within the 90 days is grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 430, Sec. 5.   (AB 181)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7083.1.

A licensee whose license is expired or suspended, and is renewable under Section 7141, or whose license is canceled, shall notify the registrar in writing of a change of address of record within 90 days, and shall maintain a current address of record during the five-year period immediately following the expiration or cancellation of the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 240, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7083.2.

(a) An applicant for licensure or registration that has a valid email address shall report to the board that email address at the time of application.

(b) A registrant or licensee that has a valid email address shall report that email address to the board at the time of renewal.

(c) To protect the privacy of applicants, registrants, and licensees, the email address provided to the board pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not be considered a public record and shall not be disclosed pursuant to Section 27 or pursuant to a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), unless required by an
 order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(d) Information sent from an email account of the board to a valid email address provided by an applicant, registrant, or licensee is presumed to have been delivered to the email address provided.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “valid email address” means an email address at which the applicant, registrant, or licensee is currently receiving email at the time the application, registration, or license renewal is submitted to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 153, Sec. 1.   (SB 630)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7084.

The registrar, with the approval of the director may adopt and promulgate the rules and regulations he deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.2. Arbitration [7085. - 7085.9.]

7085.

(a) After investigating any verified complaint alleging a violation of Section 7107, 7109, 7110, 7113, 7119, or 7120, and any complaint arising from a contract involving works of improvement and finding a possible violation, the registrar may, with the concurrence of both the licensee and the complainant, refer the alleged violation, and any dispute between the licensee and the complainant arising thereunder, to arbitration pursuant to this article, provided the registrar finds that:

(1) There is evidence that the complainant has suffered or is likely to suffer material damages as a result of a violation of Section 7107, 7109, 7110, 7113, 7119, or 7120, and any complaint arising from a contract involving works of improvement.

(2) There are reasonable grounds for the registrar to believe that the public interest would be better served by arbitration than by disciplinary action.

(3) The licensee does not have a history of repeated or similar violations.

(4) The licensee was in good standing at the time of the alleged violation.

(5) The licensee does not have any outstanding disciplinary actions filed against him or her.

(6) The parties have not previously agreed to private arbitration of the dispute pursuant to contract or otherwise.

(7) The parties have been advised of the provisions of Section 2855 of the Civil Code.

For the purposes of paragraph (1), “material damages” means damages greater than the amount of the bond required under subdivision (a) of Section 7071.6, but less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(b) In all cases in which a possible violation of the sections set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) exists and the contract price, or the demand for damages is equal to or less than the amount of the bond required under Section 7071.6, but, regardless of the contract price, the complaint shall be referred to arbitration, utilizing the criteria set forth in paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 280, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7085.2.

An arbitrator may render an award and that award shall be deemed to be an order of the registrar.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1311, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

7085.3.

Once the registrar determines that arbitration pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 7085 would be a suitable means of resolving the dispute, the registrar shall notify the complainant and the licensee of this decision. The registrar shall also notify the complainant of the consequences of selecting administrative arbitration over judicial remedies and advise the parties of their rights to retain counsel at their own expense. The registrar shall forward an “agreement to arbitrate” to the complainant and the licensee. This agreement shall be returned to the registrar within 30 calendar days of the date that the agreement is mailed by the registrar. The return of this agreement by the parties shall authorize the registrar to proceed with administrative arbitration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1132, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

7085.4.

(a) For cases that the registrar determines to refer to arbitration under subdivision (a) of Section 7085, once the complainant and the licensee authorize the registrar to proceed with administrative arbitration, the registrar shall refer the agreement to arbitrate to an arbitrator or an arbitration association approved by the board.

(b) Once the registrar determines that a complaint must be referred to arbitration pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7085, the registrar shall notify the complainant and the licensee of that decision. The registrar shall inform the parties of the consequences of administrative arbitration over judicial remedies and shall advise the parties of their right to retain counsel at their own expense if they so choose. The registrar shall forward a notice to arbitrate to the complainant and the licensee. This notice shall be returned to the registrar within 30 calendar days of the date that the notice is mailed by the registrar. The complainant’s failure to return an executed copy of the notice shall result in the closure of the complaint.

Notwithstanding Section 7085.5, a licensee’s failure to return an executed copy of the notice shall not prohibit the registrar from referring the dispute to arbitration or bar the registrar from issuing an order enforcing any award resulting therefrom, pursuant to Section 7085.6, whether the award resulted from a contested hearing or a noncontested hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1132, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

7085.5.

Arbitrations of disputes arising out of cases filed with or by the board shall be conducted in accordance with the following rules:

(a) All “agreements to arbitrate” shall include the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties to the dispute, the issue in dispute, and the amount in dollars or any other remedy sought. The appropriate fee shall be paid by the board from the Contractors License Fund.

(b) (1) The board or appointed arbitration association shall appoint an arbitrator in the following manner: immediately after the filing of the agreement to arbitrate, the board or
 appointed arbitration association shall submit simultaneously to each party to the dispute, an identical list of names of persons chosen from the panel. Each party to the dispute shall have seven days from the mailing date in which to cross off any names to which it objects, number the remaining names to indicate the order of preference, and return the list to the board or appointed arbitration association. If a party does not return the list within the time specified, all persons named in the list are acceptable. From among the persons who have been approved on both lists, and in accordance with the designated order of mutual preference, the board or appointed arbitration association shall appoint an arbitrator to serve. If the parties fail to agree on any of the parties named, if acceptable arbitrators are unable to act, or if, for any other reason, the appointment cannot be made from the
 submitted lists, the board or appointed arbitration association shall have the power to make the appointment from among other members of the panel without the submission of any additional lists. Each dispute shall be heard and determined by one arbitrator unless the board or appointed arbitration association, in its discretion, directs that a greater number of arbitrators be appointed.

(2) In all cases in which a complaint has been referred to arbitration pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7085, the board or the appointed arbitration association shall have the power to appoint an arbitrator to hear the matter.

(3) The board shall adopt regulations setting minimum qualification standards for listed arbitrators based upon relevant training, experience, and performance.

(c) No person shall serve as an arbitrator in any arbitration in which that person has any financial or personal interest in the result of the arbitration. Prior to accepting an appointment, the prospective arbitrator shall disclose any circumstances likely to prevent a prompt hearing or to create a presumption of bias. Upon receipt of that information, the board or appointed arbitration association shall immediately replace the arbitrator or communicate the information to the parties for their comments. Thereafter, the board or appointed arbitration association shall determine whether the arbitrator should be disqualified and shall inform the parties of its decision, which shall be conclusive.

(d) The board or appointed arbitration association may appoint another arbitrator if a
 vacancy occurs, or if an appointed arbitrator is unable to serve in a timely manner.

(e) (1) The board or appointed arbitration association shall provide the parties with a list of the times and dates, and locations of the hearing to be held. The parties shall notify the arbitrator, within seven calendar days of the mailing of the list, of the times and dates convenient to each party. If the parties fail to respond to the arbitrator within the seven-day period, the arbitrator shall fix the time, place, and location of the hearing. An arbitrator may, at the arbitrator’s sole discretion, make an inspection of the construction site which is the subject of the arbitration. The arbitrator shall notify the parties of the time and date set for the inspection. Any party who so desires may be present at the inspection.

(2) The board or appointed arbitration association shall fix the time, place, and location of the hearing for all cases referred to arbitration pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7085. An arbitrator may, at the arbitrator’s sole discretion, make an inspection of the construction site which is the subject of the arbitration. The arbitrator shall notify the parties of the time and date set for the inspection. Any party who desires may be present at the inspection.

(f) Any person having a direct interest in the arbitration is entitled to attend the hearing. The arbitrator shall otherwise have the power to require the exclusion of any witness, other than a party or other essential person, during the testimony of any other witness. It shall be discretionary with the arbitrator to
 determine the propriety of the attendance of any other person.

(g) Hearings shall be adjourned by the arbitrator only for good cause.

(h) A record is not required to be taken of the proceedings. However, any party to the proceeding may have a record made at its own expense. The parties may make appropriate notes of the proceedings.

(i) The hearing shall be conducted by the arbitrator in any manner which will permit full and expeditious presentation of the case by both parties. Consistent with the expedited nature of arbitration, the arbitrator shall establish the extent of, and schedule for, the production of relevant documents and other information, the identification of any witnesses to be called, and a schedule for any
 hearings to elicit facts solely within the knowledge of one party. The complaining party shall present its claims, proofs, and witnesses, who shall submit to questions or other examination. The defending party shall then present its defenses, proofs, and witnesses, who shall submit to questions or other examination. The arbitrator has discretion to vary this procedure but shall afford full and equal opportunity to the parties for the presentation of any material or relevant proofs.

(j) The arbitration may proceed in the absence of any party who, after due notice, fails to be present. The arbitrator shall require the attending party to submit supporting evidence in order to make an award. An award for the attending party shall not be based solely on the fact that the other party has failed to appear at the arbitration hearing.

(k) The arbitrator shall be the sole judge of the relevancy and materiality of the evidence offered and conformity to legal rules of evidence shall not be required.

(l) The arbitrator may receive and consider documentary evidence. Documents to be considered by the arbitrator may be submitted prior to the hearing. However, a copy shall be simultaneously transmitted to all other parties and to the board or appointed arbitration association for transmittal to the arbitrator or board appointed arbitrator.

(m) The arbitrator shall specifically inquire of the parties whether they have any further proofs to offer or witnesses to be heard. Upon receiving negative replies, the arbitrator shall declare the hearing
 closed and minutes thereof shall be recorded. If briefs are to be filed, the hearing shall be declared closed as of the final date set by the arbitrator for the receipt of briefs. If documents are to be filed as requested by the arbitrator and the date set for their receipt is later than that set for the receipt of briefs, the later date shall be the date of closing the hearings. The time limit within which the arbitrator is required to make the award shall commence to run, in the absence of other agreements by the parties, upon the closing of the hearings.

(n) The hearing may be reopened on the arbitrator’s own motion.

(o) Any party who proceeds with the arbitration after knowledge that any provision or requirement of these rules has not been complied with, and who fails to state their
 objections to the arbitrator in writing, within 10 calendar days of close of hearing, shall be deemed to have waived their right to object.

(p) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any papers or process necessary or proper for the initiation or continuation of an arbitration under these rules and for any court action in connection therewith, or for the entry of judgment on an award made thereunder, may be served upon any party (A) by regular mail addressed to that party or their attorney at the party’s last known address, or (B) by personal service.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), in all cases referred to arbitration pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7085 in which the contractor fails or refuses to return an executed copy of the notice to
 arbitrate within the time specified, any papers or process specified in paragraph (1) to be sent to the contractor, including the notice of hearing, shall be mailed by certified mail to the contractor’s address of record.

(q) The award shall be made promptly by the arbitrator, and unless otherwise agreed by the parties, no later than 30 calendar days from the date of closing the hearing, closing a reopened hearing, or if oral hearing has been waived, from the date of transmitting the final statements and proofs to the arbitrator.

The arbitrator may for good cause extend any period of time established by these rules, except the time for making the award. The arbitrator shall notify the parties of any extension and the reason therefor.

(r) (1) The arbitrator may grant any remedy or relief that the arbitrator deems just and equitable and within the scope of the board’s referral and the requirements of the board. The arbitrator, in their sole discretion, may award costs or expenses.

(2) The amendments made in paragraph (1) during the 2003–04 Regular Session shall not be interpreted to prevent an arbitrator from awarding a complainant all direct costs and expenses for the completion or repair of the project.

(s) The award shall become final 30 calendar days from the date the arbitration award is issued. The arbitrator, upon written application of a party to the arbitration, may correct the award upon the following grounds:

(1) There was an evident miscalculation of figures or an evident mistake in the description of any person, things, or property referred to in the award.

(2) There is any other clerical error in the award, not affecting the merits of the controversy.

An application for correction of the award shall be made within 10 calendar days of the date of service of the award by serving a copy of the application on the arbitrator, and all other parties to the arbitration. Any party to the arbitration may make a written objection to the application for correction by serving a copy of the written objection on the arbitrator, the board, and all other parties to the arbitration, within 10 calendar days of the date of service of the application for correction.

The
 arbitrator shall either deny the application or correct the award within 30 calendar days of the date of service of the original award by mailing a copy of the denial or correction to all parties to the arbitration. Any appeal from the denial or correction shall be filed with a court of competent jurisdiction and a true copy thereof shall be filed with the arbitrator or appointed arbitration
 association within 30 calendar days after the award has become final. The award shall be in writing, and shall be signed by the arbitrator or a majority of them. If no appeal is filed within the 30-calendar day period, it shall become a final order of the registrar.

(t) Service of the award by certified mail shall be effective if a certified letter containing the award, or a true copy thereof, is mailed by the arbitrator or arbitration association to each party or to a party’s attorney of record at their last known address, address of record, or by personally serving any party. Service may be proved in the manner authorized in civil actions.

(u) The board shall pay the expenses of one expert witness appointed by the board when the services of an expert witness are requested
 by either party involved in arbitration pursuant to this article and the case involves workmanship issues that are itemized in the complaint and have not been repaired or replaced. Parties who choose to present the findings of another expert witness as evidence shall pay for those services. Payment for expert witnesses appointed by the board shall be limited to the expert witness costs for inspection of the problem at the construction site, preparation of the expert witness’ report, and expert witness fees for appearing or testifying at a hearing. All requests for payment to an expert witness shall be submitted on a form that has been approved by the registrar. All requests for payment to an expert witness shall be reviewed and approved by the board prior to payment. The registrar shall advise the parties that names of industry experts may be obtained by requesting this information from the registrar.

(v) The arbitrator shall interpret and apply these rules insofar as they relate to their powers and duties.

(w) The following shall apply as to court procedure and exclusion of liability:

(1) The board, the appointed arbitration association, or any arbitrator in a proceeding under these rules is not a necessary party in judicial proceedings relating to the arbitration.

(2) Parties to these rules shall be deemed to have consented that judgment upon the arbitration award may be entered in any federal or state court having jurisdiction thereof.

(3) The board, the appointed arbitration association, or any arbitrator
 is not liable to any party for any act or omission in connection with any arbitration conducted under these rules.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 60.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7085.6.

(a) (1) The failure of a licensee to comply with an arbitration award rendered under this article shall result in the automatic suspension of a license by operation of law.

(2) The registrar shall notify the licensee by certified mail of the failure to comply with the arbitrator’s award, and that the license shall be automatically suspended 30 calendar days from the date of that notice.

(3) The licensee may appeal the suspension for noncompliance within 15 calendar days after service of the notice by written notice to the registrar.

(4) Reinstatement may be made at any time following the suspension by complying with the arbitrator’s award and the final order of the registrar. If no reinstatement of the license is made within 90 days of the date of the automatic suspension, the license and any other contractor’s license issued to the licensee shall be automatically revoked by operation of law for a period to be determined by the registrar pursuant to Section 7102.

(5) The registrar may delay, for good cause, the revocation of a contractor’s license for failure to comply with the arbitration award. The delay in the revocation of the license shall not exceed one year. When seeking a delay of the revocation of his or her license, a licensee shall apply to the registrar in writing prior to the date of the revocation of the licensee’s license by operation of law and state the reasons that establish good cause for the delay. The registrar’s power to grant a delay of
 the revocation shall expire upon the effective date of the revocation of the licensee’s license by operation of law.

(b) The licensee shall be automatically prohibited from serving as an officer, director, associate, partner, manager, or qualifying individual of another licensee, for the period determined by the registrar and the employment, election, or association of that person by another licensee shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action. A qualifier disassociated pursuant to this section shall be replaced within 90 days from the date of disassociation. Upon failure to replace the qualifier within 90 days of the disassociation, the license of the other licensee shall be automatically suspended or the qualifier’s classification removed at the end of the 90 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 698, Sec. 24.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7085.7.

A complainant may enforce an arbitrator’s award in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1285) of Title 9 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1311, Sec. 8.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

7085.9.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a complaint referred to arbitration pursuant to Section 7085 is not subject to disclosure to the public until such time as an investigation into an alleged violation of Section 7085.6 has been initiated by the registrar.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1035, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Disciplinary Proceedings [7090. - 7124.6.]

7090.

The registrar may upon his or her own motion and shall upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any applicant, contractor, or home improvement salesperson within the state and may deny the licensure or the renewal of licensure of, or cite, temporarily suspend, or permanently revoke any license or registration if the applicant, licensee, or registrant, is guilty of or commits any one or more of the acts or omissions constituting causes for disciplinary action.

The registrar may proceed to take disciplinary action as in this article provided against an applicant or a person licensed or registered under the provisions of this chapter even though the grounds or cause for such disciplinary